Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.400

Legal services.

The superintendent of public instruction shall be responsible for the provision of legal services to all educational service districts: PROVIDED, That any educational service district board may contract with any county for the legal services of its prosecuting attorney.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 35; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 23. Formerly RCW 28A.21.195.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.